Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 8. Post-dated Check Cashing

§ 40-14-362.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

40-14-362

through

40-14-367

:

“Post-dated check or similar arrangement” means the act of lending money in which a check or draft is dated on a date subsequent to the date it was written or dated on the date written but held for any period of days prior to deposit or presentment due to the check casher’s agreement with or representations to a debtor, whether express or implied;

“Post-dated check casher” means a person engaged in the business of lending money by means of post-dated check transactions or similar arrangements.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1; 2014 ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “through

40-14-367

” for “through

40-14-364

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-363.
License required; post-dated check finance charge; limits on amount financed and terms; minimum finance charge.

No person shall engage in business as a post-dated check casher in this state unless licensed in accordance with W.S.

40-14-634

. No post-dated check casher may contract for, charge or receive any amount as a charge in connection with a post-dated check or similar arrangement other than a post-dated check finance charge as stated in this subsection. No post-dated check finance charge shall exceed the greater of thirty dollars ($30.00) or twenty percent (20%) per month on the principal balance of the post-dated check or similar arrangement.

The maximum term of any post-dated check or similar arrangement subject to this part shall be one (1) calendar month. Extended payment plans under W.S.

40-14-366

are not subject to this subsection.

Post-dated check finance charges are fully earned on the day the post-dated check or similar arrangement is made.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1; 2014 ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b), added the second sentence.

§ 40-14-364.
Limitation on multiple agreements.

No post-dated check or similar arrangement shall be repaid, refinanced or otherwise consolidated by proceeds of another post-dated check or similar arrangement accepted by the same post-dated check casher.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1.

§ 40-14-365.
Right to rescind.

A post-dated check or similar arrangement with a post-dated check casher may be rescinded by the consumer on or before 5:00 p.m. Mountain Time of the following business day, provided that the consumer returns to the post-dated check casher in cash or certified funds the full original amount of funds advanced. A rescission under this section shall be at no cost to the consumer.

Information regarding how to exercise the right to rescind shall be provided in writing to the consumer at the consummation of every post-dated check or similar arrangement.

History:

2014 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2014, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, renumbered former

40-14-365

as

40-14-368

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 70, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.